
NOS SGPS SA (NOS.LS)  People | Reuters.com


























































X



Edition:

United States


















Africa
América Latina


عربي
Argentina


Brasil
Canada


中国
Deutschland


España
France


India
Italia


日本
México


РОССИЯ
United Kingdom

United States
















NOS SGPS SA (NOS.LS)










Related Topics: 
StocksStock ScreenerMarket DataTelecommunications ServicesIntegrated Telecommunications Services












                
                        Overview
                    



                
                        News
                    



                
                        Key Developments
                    



                
                        People
                    



                
                        Charts
                    



                
                        Financials
                    



                
                        Analysts
                    



                    
                            Research
                        



                    
                            Pulse
                        










				NOS.LS on Lisbon Stock Exchange


				5.42EUR
5:44am EDT





				    Change	(% chg)


		    
						    €-0.03


					            (-0.50%)
					        






Prev Close

€5.44


Open

€5.47




Day's High

€5.47


Day's Low

€5.39




Volume

83,341


Avg. Vol

663,285




52-wk High

€6.30


52-wk Low

€4.77











					Summary





Name
Age
Since
Current Position




							Jorge Brito Pereira


2013

                                Chairman of the Board of Directors




							Miguel Nuno Santos Almeida

50
2013

                                Chief Executive Officer, Executive Director




							Jose Pedro Faria Pereira da Costa

46
2016

                                Chief Financial Officer, Vice President, Executive Director




							Jorge Filipe Santos Graca


2016

                                Executive Member of the Board of Directors




							Ana Paula Garrido de Pina Marques


2013

                                Executive Director




							Andre Nuno Malheiro dos Santos Almeida


2013

                                Executive Director




							Manuel Ramalho Eanes


2013

                                Executive Director




							Sandra Martins Esteves Aires


2013

                                Secretary




							Joao Torres Dolores


2016

                                Member of the Board of Directors




							Joaquim Francisco Alves Ferreira de Oliveira

66
2008

                                Non-Executive Director




							Catarina Eufemia Amorim da Luz Tavira

40
2012

                                Non-Executive Director




							Antonio Bernardo Aranha da Gama Lobo Xavier

57
2013

                                Non-Executive Director




							Lorena Solange Fernandes da Silva Fernandes


2013

                                Non-Executive Director




							Mario Filipe Moreira Leite da Silva

41
2010

                                Non-Executive Director




							Angelo Gabriel Ribeirinho dos Santos Pauperio

57
2013

                                Non-Executive Director




							Maria Claudia Teixeira de Azevedo

47
2013

                                Non-Executive Director




							Maria Joao Carrapato




                                IR Contact Officer



» Insider Trading





					Biographies





Name
Description




							Jorge Brito Pereira


					
							Mr. Jorge Brito Pereira serves as the Chairman of the Board of Directors of NOS, SGPS, S.A. since October 1, 2013. He was Partner of PLMJ and Teacher at the Law School of the Lisbon University. He served as Member of the Board of PLMJ – Sociedade de Advogados, RL, Member of the Board of De Grisogono SA, Member of the Board of CIMIPAR – Sociedade Gestora de Participações Sociais, SA (2006/2007), Member of the Board of PARAREDE, SGPS, SA (2002-2005), Member of the Remunerations Comittee of Glintt, SA, Chairman of the General Meeting of Shareholders of Sport TV, SA, Chairman of the General Meeting of Shareholders of SAPEC, SGPS, SA, Chairman of the General Meeting of Shareholders of Oxy Capital - Sociedade de Capital de Risco, S.A, Chairman of the General Meeting of Shareholders of ONETIER Partners SGPS, SA, Chairman of the General Meeting of Shareholders of CIMINVEST – Sociedade de Investimentos e participações S.A, Chairman of the General Meeting of Shareholders of SANTORO FINANCE – Prestação de Serviços, S.A and Chairman of the General Meeting of Shareholders of SANTORO FINANCIAL HOLDINGS, SGPS, S.A. He holds a Degree in Law by the Law School of the Universidade Catolica Portuguesa (Lisboa), Masters Degree in Law, specialization in Legal Sciences, by the Law School of the Universidade de Lisboa and Leading Professional Services Firms – Harvard Business School (2013).




							Miguel Nuno Santos Almeida


					
							Mr. Miguel Nuno Santos Almeida serves as the Chief Executive Officer and Executive Director of NOS, SGPS, S.A. since October 2, 2013. He served as Member of the Board of Directors and Executive Director of Sonaecom, SGPS, S.A., CEO of Optimus – Comunicações, S.A., Chairman of the Board of Be Artis – Concepção, Construção e Gestão de Redes de Comunicações, Be Towering – Gestão de Torres de Telecomunicações and Per-Mar, Sociedade de Construções, Member of the Board of Directors of PCJ – Público, Comunicação e Jornalismo; Público – Comunicação Social, Sonae com – Sistemas de Informação, SGPS, Optimus, SGPS Empreendimentos Imobiliários and WeDo Consulting – Sistemas de Informação. He was also Executive Board Member of Optimus with responsibility for Marketing and Sales and Head of Marketing of Modelo Continente, SGPS. He holds a degree in Mechanical Engineering by the College of Engineering of the Universidade do Porto and an MBA by INSEAD.




							Jose Pedro Faria Pereira da Costa


					
							Mr. Jose Pedro Faria Pereira da Costa serves as Chief Financial Officer, Vice President, Executive Director of NOS, SGPS, S.A. He is Executive Director since September 21, 2007 and as the Company's Chief Financial Officer since October 2, 2013. He has been the Company's Executive Committee Member since September 21, 2007. He is Chairman of the Board of Directors and Director of several ZON companies. He was Grupo Portugal Telecom’s Director and Chief Financial Officer (CFO) of PT Comunicacoes PT.COM and PT Prime from September 2002 to September 2007. He has been Manager of DCSI and Non-Executive Director of PT ACS; Previsao, PT Prestacoes, PT SI, PT PRO, Paginas Amarelas, Tradecom and Banco Best. He was also Vice-Chairman of a joint venture between PT/Telefonica from June 2001 to September 2002. He was also Executive Vice-Chairman of Telesp Celular Participacoes. He acted as Board Member of PT Moveis SGPS between June 2000 and June 2001. He was also CFO of Jazztel plc between February and June 2000. From January 1997 to January 2000, he was Member for the Banco Santander de Negocios Portugal’s Executive Committee between January 1997 and January 2000, responsible for Corporate Finance. He began his professional career in 1990 at McKinsey & Company where he was Project Head. He graduated in Business Administration from Universidade Catolica Portuguesa (Lisboa) and gained a Masters of Business Administration from INSEAD in 1992.




							Jorge Filipe Santos Graca


					
							Mr. Jorge Filipe Santos Graca serves as Executive Member of the Board of Directors at NOS, SGPS, S.A. since April 26, 2016. He is Member of the Board of Directors of NOS Comunicações S.A.; Member of the Board of Directors of NOS Technology Concepção, Construção e Gestão de Redes de Comunicações S.A.; Member of the Board of Directors of NOS Towering Gestão de Torres de Telecomunicações S.A.; Member of the Board of Directors of NOS - Sistemas Serviços em Tecnologia de Informação S.A.; Member of the Board of Directors of NOS Inovação S.A. Member of the Board of Directors of NOS Açores Comunicações S.A.; Member of the Board of Directors of NOS Madeira Comunicações S.A.; Member of the Board of Directors of NOS Lusomundo Cinemas S.A.; Member of the Board of Directors of NOS Lusomundo Audiovisuais S.A.; Member of the Board of Directors of NOS Lusomundo TV S.A.; Member of the Board of Directors of NOSPUB Publicidade e Conteúdos S.A.; Former Director of NOS Comunicações S.A. responsible for the Residential Product, Product Development and negotiation of contents; Former Director of ZON TV Cabo responsible of Product and Marketing, Director of Product TV of ZON TV Cabo; Former Project Leader at The Boston Consulting Group. He holds degree in Business Management and Administration from Universidade Catolica Portuguesa (Lisboa); MBA from Kellogg School of Management at Northwestern University.




							Ana Paula Garrido de Pina Marques


					
							Ms. Ana Paula Garrido de Pina Marques serves as an Executive Director of Nos, SGPS, S.A. since October 2, 2013. She served as Executive Board Member of Optimus – Comunicações with responsibility over Residential, Customer Service and Operations; President of APRITEL (Association of the Operators of Electronic Communications). Previously Head of Marketing and Sales of the Personal Mobile Business Unit. During her time with Optimus she was also Head of Marketing and Communication, as well as Head of The Data Business Unit. She started her career at the Marketing Department of Procter & Gamble. She holds a degree in Degree in Economics by the College of Economics of the University of Porto and an MBA by INSEAD.




							Andre Nuno Malheiro dos Santos Almeida


					
							Mr. Andre Nuno Malheiro dos Santos Almeida serves as the Executive Director of Nos, SGPS, S.A. since October 2, 2013. He served as Executive Member of the Board of ZON TVCabo, ZON Lusomundo Audiovisuais, ZAP Angola and ZAP Moçambique, responsible for Business Development, International Business, Planning and Control and Corporate Finance of ZON Multimédia; Executive Board Member of ZON TVCabo responsible for Product and Marketing; Head of Product Management and Coordination of ZON TVCabo, Head of Business Development of Fixed Business at PT, Head of Strategy and Business Development at PT and Head of Project at PT SGPS, associate of The Boston Consulting Group. He holds a degree in Engineering and Industrial Management by the Instituto Superior Tecnico and an MBA by INSEAD.




							Manuel Ramalho Eanes


					
							Mr. Manuel Ramalho Eanes serves as the Executive Director of Nos, SGPS, S.A. since October 2, 2013. He served as Executive Board Member of Optimus – Comunicações, SA with responsibility over the areas of Corporates and Operators, headed at Optimus in the areas of Residential Fixed Business, Central Marketing and Data Services, Personal Sales, Small Businesses and Business Development. He started his career at McKinsey & Co. He holds a Degree in Business Management by the Universidade Catolica Portuguesa (Lisboa) and an MBA by INSEAD.




							Sandra Martins Esteves Aires


					
							Ms. Sandra Martins Esteves Aires serves as Company Secretary of Nos, SGPS, S.A. since October 2, 2013.




							Joao Torres Dolores







							Joaquim Francisco Alves Ferreira de Oliveira


					
							Mr. Joaquim Francisco Alves Ferreira de Oliveira serves as a Non-Executive Director of Nos, SGPS, S.A. since January 31, 2008. He was first appointed for the Company (former PT Multimedia SGPS) in 2001, ending term in May 2005. Since 1984, when he founded Olivedesportos, he has been Chairman of the Board of several companies in the business group called Controlinveste. He bought sports paper O Jogo in 1994, and set up PPTV in 1996, through which he founded the cable TV sports channel in conjunction with RTP and PT Multimedia (now ZON) - Sport TV, which he is Chairman of. He has also been Chairman of the Boards of Directors of Sportinveste Multimedia SGPS and Sportinveste Multimedia founded in 2001. In 2005, he purchased what was then called Grupo Lusomundo Media (now Controlinveste Media), and chairs various companies within the group.




							Catarina Eufemia Amorim da Luz Tavira


					
							Ms. Catarina Eufemia Amorim da Luz Tavira serves as a Non-Executive Director of Nos, SGPS, S.A. since November 27, 2012. She was Head of the product and service department of UNITEL SA from 2005 to 2009 and Marketing and Product Director at ZAP – Distribuidora de TV por Satelite since 2010. She holds a degree in Management and Business from Instituto Universitario de Lisboa ISCTE.




							Antonio Bernardo Aranha da Gama Lobo Xavier


					
							Dr. Antonio Bernardo Aranha da Gama Lobo Xavier serves as the Non-Executive Director of Nos, SGPS, S.A. since October 1, 2013. He served as Partner and Member of the Board of Directors of Morais Leitão, Galvão Teles, Soares da Silva & Associados; Member of the Board of Directors of the following companies: Sonaecom, SGPS, S.A. (Executive); Optimus – Comunicações S.A.; Sonaecom Sistemas de Informação, S.A.; PCJ – Publico, Comunicação e Jornalismo, S.A.; Público Comunicação, S.A.; BPI, SGPS S.A.; Riopele, S.A. Mota-Engil, SGPS, S.A. He holds a Law Degree and Masters Degree in Economic Law by the Universidade de Coimbra.




							Lorena Solange Fernandes da Silva Fernandes


					
							Ms. Lorena Solange Fernandes da Silva Fernandes serves as the Non-Executive Director of Nos, SGPS, S.A. since October 1, 2013. She served as Store Manager, Head of the Agents and Store Department and Senior Agents Manager at Unitel, SA. She has done Senior Executive Program from London Business School, Post-Graduation in Labor Law and Social Security by the Law College of the Universidade de Lisboa, MBA – Financial and Commercial Management by the Brazilian Business School – International Business School and she holds a degree in Business Management by the College of Economics and Management of the Angolan Lusíadas University.




							Mario Filipe Moreira Leite da Silva


					
							Mr. Mario Filipe Moreira Leite da Silva serves as a Non-Executive Director of Nos, SGPS, S.A. since April 19, 2010. He is a Member of the Appointment and Assessment Committee of the Company. He has been Chairman of the Board of Directors of Fidequity – Servicos de Gestao SA since 2006. He holds a degree in Economics from Faculdade de Economia do Porto.




							Angelo Gabriel Ribeirinho dos Santos Pauperio


					
							Mr. Angelo Gabriel Ribeirinho dos Santos Pauperio serves as the Non-Executive Director of Nos, SGPS, S.A. since October 1, 2013. Member of the Board of Directors of the Companies (CEO); Sonaecom, SGPS, S.A. (CEO); Sonae, SGPS, S.A. (Executive Vice-President); Sonae Investimentos, SGPS, S.A.(Vice-President); Sonae MC – Modelo Continente, SGPS, S.A. (Vice-President); Sonae – Specialized Retail, SGPS, S.A. (Vice-President); Sonae – Retail Properties, S.A. (President); Sonae Sierra, SGPS, S.A.; Optimus – Comunicações, S.A. (President); Sonaecom – Sistemas de Informação, SGPS, S.A. (President); PCJ – Público, Comunicação e Jornalismo, S.A. (President); Público – Comunicação Social, S.A. (President); Sonaegest, S.A. (President); Sonae RE, S.A. (President); MDS, SGPS, S.A.; Sonae Center Serviços II, S.A.; Sonae Investments, B.V.; Sontel B.V.; WeDo Consulting, Sistemas de Informação, S.A. (President); ZOPT, SGPS, S.A. Chairman of the Board of the Portuguese Association of Industrial Management and Engineering. He holds a degree in Civil Engineering by the College of Engineering of the Universidade do Porto and MBA by the Porto Business School-UPBS.




							Maria Claudia Teixeira de Azevedo


					
							Ms. Maria Claudia Teixeira de Azevedo serves as the Non-Executive Director of Nos, SGPS, S.A. since October 1, 2013. She served as Member of the Board of Directors of the following companies: Sonae Capital, SGPS, S.A. (CEO). Sonae Turismo, SGPS, S.A. (CEO); Sonaecom Sistemas de Informação, SGPS, S.A. (CEO). Sonaecom, SGPS, S.A. (Executive Member); Cape Technologies Limited (Chairman of the Board of Directors); Digitmarket – Sistemas de Informação, S.A. (Chairman of the Board of Directors); Efanor – Serviços de Apoio à Gestão, S.A. (Chairman of the Board of Directors); FC Assert, SGPS, S.A.; Fundação Belmiro de Azevedo; Imparfin, SGPS, S.A. (Chairman of the Board of Directors); Infosystems – Sociedade de Sistemas de Informação, S.A.; Linhacom, SGPS, S.A. (Chairman of the Board of Directors); Lugares Virtuais, S.A. (Chairman of the Board of Directors); Mainroad – Mainroad – Serviços de Tecnologias de Informação, S.A.; Miauger – Organização e Gestão de Leilões Electrónicos, S.A. (Chairman of the Board of Directors); Optimus – Comunicações, S.A.; PCJ – Público, Comunicação, e Jornalismo, S.A.; Praça Foz – Sociedade Imobiliária, S.A.; Praesidium Services Limited (Chairman of the Board of Directors); Público - Comunicação Social, S.A.; Saphety Level – Trusted Services, S.A. (Chairman of the Board of Directors); Saphety Level Transaccciones Electronicas, S.A.S.; Selfrio, S.A.; Sistavac, S.A.; SMP, S.A.; SKK, S.A.; Sonaecom – Serviços Partilhados, S.A.; Sonaecom – Sistemas de Información Espana, S.L. ; Sontaria – Empreendimentos Imobiliários, S.A.; Spread, SGPS, S.A.; WeDo Consulting, Sistemas de Informação, S.A.; ZOPT, SGPS, S.A.; WeDo Poland Sp. Z.o.o.; WeDo Technologies Americas Inc.; WeDo Technologies Australia PTY Limited; WeDo Technologies Egypt; WeDo Technologies Mexico, S. De R.L. De C.V.; WeDo Technologies Australia PTY Limited. She holds Management degree by the Universidade Catolica Portuguesa (Porto) and MBA from INSEAD.




							Maria Joao Carrapato














					Basic Compensation





Name
Fiscal Year Total




							Jorge Brito Pereira

134,558




							Miguel Nuno Santos Almeida

876,153




							Jose Pedro Faria Pereira da Costa

659,200




							Jorge Filipe Santos Graca

343,089




							Ana Paula Garrido de Pina Marques

497,822




							Andre Nuno Malheiro dos Santos Almeida

358,247




							Manuel Ramalho Eanes

497,822




							Sandra Martins Esteves Aires

--




							Joao Torres Dolores

41,637




							Joaquim Francisco Alves Ferreira de Oliveira

52,279




							Catarina Eufemia Amorim da Luz Tavira

52,279




							Antonio Bernardo Aranha da Gama Lobo Xavier

55,918




							Lorena Solange Fernandes da Silva Fernandes

52,279




							Mario Filipe Moreira Leite da Silva

73,639




							Angelo Gabriel Ribeirinho dos Santos Pauperio

73,639




							Maria Claudia Teixeira de Azevedo

52,279




							Maria Joao Carrapato

--



As Of 
30 Dec 2016





					Options Compensation





Name
Options
Value




							Jorge Brito Pereira

0
0




							Miguel Nuno Santos Almeida

0
0




							Jose Pedro Faria Pereira da Costa

0
0




							Jorge Filipe Santos Graca

0
0




							Ana Paula Garrido de Pina Marques

0
0




							Andre Nuno Malheiro dos Santos Almeida

0
0




							Manuel Ramalho Eanes

0
0




							Sandra Martins Esteves Aires

0
0




							Joao Torres Dolores

0
0




							Joaquim Francisco Alves Ferreira de Oliveira

0
0




							Catarina Eufemia Amorim da Luz Tavira

0
0




							Antonio Bernardo Aranha da Gama Lobo Xavier

0
0




							Lorena Solange Fernandes da Silva Fernandes

0
0




							Mario Filipe Moreira Leite da Silva

0
0




							Angelo Gabriel Ribeirinho dos Santos Pauperio

0
0




							Maria Claudia Teixeira de Azevedo

0
0




							Maria Joao Carrapato

0
0









					Insider Trading




» Full list on Insider Trading
















Related Topics: 
StocksStock ScreenerMarket DataTelecommunications ServicesIntegrated Telecommunications Services






















NOS, S.G.P.S., S.A.: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































August 03, 2017 10:57 AM ET
Media

Company Overview of NOS, S.G.P.S., S.A.



Snapshot People




Company Overview
NOS, S.G.P.S., S.A. offers integrated telecommunications services worldwide. It operates through Telco and Audiovisuals segments. The company offers fixed and mobile solutions for television, Internet, voice, and data for residential, personal, business, and wholesale markets, as well as pay TV, next generation broadband, and cinema distribution and exhibition services. It also provides content; manages and acquires rights; and distributes movies and series. The company distributes its products to cinema, home entertainment, and TV platforms. In addition, it engages in content exhibition in movie theatres; operating as a programming aggregator on a linear and non-linear model, providing chan...
NOS, S.G.P.S., S.A. offers integrated telecommunications services worldwide. It operates through Telco and Audiovisuals segments. The company offers fixed and mobile solutions for television, Internet, voice, and data for residential, personal, business, and wholesale markets, as well as pay TV, next generation broadband, and cinema distribution and exhibition services. It also provides content; manages and acquires rights; and distributes movies and series. The company distributes its products to cinema, home entertainment, and TV platforms. In addition, it engages in content exhibition in movie theatres; operating as a programming aggregator on a linear and non-linear model, providing channels and services to other operators; managing a pay TV advertising business under the NOS Publicidade brand; selling advertising space; and providing advertising solutions, such as product placement, sponsoring, and complementary online presence related with content wholesale. Further, the company designs, constructs, and manages electronic communications networks, and equipment and infrastructures; and installs and manages towers and other sites for the roll-out of telecommunications equipment. Additionally, it manages real estate properties; commercializes other public events; offers consulting services in the area of information systems; owns intellectual property; provides electronic communications services and equipment; promotes scientific research and development activities; imports, distributes, commercializes, and produces audiovisual products; and purchases, sells, and rents property. It also engages in the realization of urbanization and building construction, planning, urban management, studies, construction and property management, and buy and sale of properties. NOS, S.G.P.S., S.A. has a strategic partnership with Huawei. The company was founded in 1999 and is headquartered in Lisbon, Portugal. NOS, SGPS, S.A. is a subsidiary of ZOPT, SGPS, S.A.
Detailed Description


Rua Ator António Silva, nº 9Campo GrandeLisbon,  1600-404PortugalFounded in 19992,522 Employees



Phone: 351 21 782 4700

Fax: 351 21 782 4735

www.nos.pt







Key Executives for NOS, S.G.P.S., S.A.




Mr. Miguel Nuno Santos Almeida


      	CEO & Executive Director 
      


Age: 50
        

Total Annual Compensation: €549.2K








Mr. José Pedro Faria Pereira  da Costa


      	Deputy Executive Officer, CFO, VP & Executive Director
      


Age: 49
        

Total Annual Compensation: €419.6K








Ms. Ana Paula Garrido Pina Marques


      	Executive Director 
      


Total Annual Compensation: €312.8K








Mr. Manuel António Neto Portugal Ramalho Eanes


      	Executive Director 
      


Total Annual Compensation: €312.8K








Mr. André Nuno Malheiro  dos Santos Almeida


      	Executive Director 
      


Age: 40
        

Total Annual Compensation: €237.3K





Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2016. 

NOS, S.G.P.S., S.A. Key Developments

NOS, S.G.P.S., S.A., Q2 2017 Earnings Call, Jul 21, 2017
Jul 20 17
NOS, S.G.P.S., S.A., Q2 2017 Earnings Call, Jul 21, 2017


NOS, S.G.P.S., S.A. Announces Consolidated Earnings Results for the Second Quarter of 2017
Jul 20 17
NOS, S.G.P.S., S.A. announced consolidated earnings results for the second quarter of 2017. For the quarter, the revenues grew by EUR 15.6 million, equal to an increase of 4.2%, compared to the second quarter of 2016, as a result of continuous growth in services, while EBITDA increased by 5.4% to EUR 156.7 million. Consolidated Net Profit grew by EUR 13.9 million to reach a total of EUR 40.4 million, reflecting the positive contribution from affiliated companies. Free Cash Flow totalled EUR 43.9 million. Capital Expenditure (total CAPEX) was EUR 85.7 million.


NOS, SGPS, S.A., Q1 2017 Earnings Call, Apr 28, 2017
Apr 28 17
NOS, SGPS, S.A., Q1 2017 Earnings Call, Apr 28, 2017


Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 Abril Controljornal Editora, Lda Europe ActualSales Europe AGEFINAN - Agência de Notícias Financeiras, SA Europe Airplus TV Portugal Europe Alfasom-Sonorização e Audiovisuais, Lda Europe




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target





Merger/Acquisition

			      August 5, 2016
			    
SPORT TV Portugal S.A.





Request Profile Update


				\
	














 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact NOS, S.G.P.S., S.A., please visit www.nos.pt.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close






























NOS (Portuguese media company) - Wikipedia






















 






NOS (Portuguese media company)

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


NOS SGPS





Type

Sociedade Anónima


Traded as
Euronext: NOS


Industry
Telecommunications, media


Founded
1994 (as PT Multimédia)
2007 (spin-off from Portugal Telecom)
2013 (merger with Optimus Telecomunicações)
2014 (as NOS)


Headquarters
Lisbon, Portugal



Key people

Miguel Almeida (CEO)
Isabel dos Santos
(non-executive administrator)


Products
Cable television (HFC), FTTH, broadband Internet access, landline, mobile operator, television broadcasting, film distribution, movie theater operation


Revenue
€1.44 billion (2015)[1]



Operating income

€533 million (2015)[2]


Profit
€82.7 million (2015)[3]


Total assets
€2.889 billion (2013)[4]


Total equity
€250.2 million (end 2010)[5]



Number of employees

1,875 (Q1 2014)


Subsidiaries
NOS Comunicações (100%), NOS Madeira Comunicações, S.A. (78%), NOS Açores Comunicações, S.A. (84%), NOS Audiovisuais (100%), NOS Cinemas (100%), Sport TV (25%), Dreamia (50%) and ZAP (30%)


Website
www.nos.pt


NOS is a Portuguese media holding company whose main assets include a satellite, cable operator, and ISP, a mobile phone operator, a movie distributor (NOS Audiovisuais) and a virtual carrier of mobile phone services. Its services include cable television, cable internet and VOIP. NOS (formerly PT Multimédia, ZON Multimédia and ZON Optimus) is the spun-off media arm of Portugal Telecom. NOS produces several premium channels for the TV platform, which include SportTV (joint-venture with Controlinveste) and TVCine. NOS Audiovisuais (formerly ZON Lusomundo) is also the home-video distributor of Walt Disney Pictures, Warner Bros., DreamWorks and Paramount Pictures releases in the Portuguese market, alongside of launching several independent and European titles.



Contents


1 History
2 See also
3 References
4 External links



History[edit]
NOS was founded as TVCabo in 1994, and was the third cable operator to be founded in Portugal (the first was the regional Cabo TV Madeirense, which was founded in 1992, followed by Bragatel early on in 1994). The first customer was connecter in November 1994. Initially the channel offer consisted of thirty channels and the number of Portuguese-speaking channels was initially limited to the terrestrial channels, with the number of Portuguese-speaking channels increasing as the years went on.
The company might be considered a Portuguese dot-com. In the PT Multimédia days, it brought Portugal Telecom SAPO (a successful web portal and search engine, sold to its parent company in 2005), Lusomundo (a successful movie distributor, movie theater operator included in the spun off company and, formerly, the owner of the Diário de Notícias newspaper and the TSF radio, which were sold to Controlinveste the same year as SAPO was sold) and several TV channels such as SportTV, CNL (now SIC Notícias) and TVCine. (MOV was only created after the spin-off).
On 17 January 2008, ZON announced it would acquire TVTEL, its main competitor in both cable and satellite broadcasting in Porto region. Thus, ZON is strengthening its position due to the appearance of a new significant rival, MEO from Portugal Telecom, using IPTV and satellite broadcasting systems, and there remains one other more cable television and internet operator in Portugal, Cabovisão.
On 29 September 2008, ZON Multimédia announced the new mobile product ZON Mobile (MVNO), the first real quad play operator in Portugal.
In November 2008, ZON announced that it would enter the contest for the fifth channel that would be created at the same time as Digital Terrestrial Television is introduced in Portugal.
On 17 March 2010, ZON renamed its cable and satellite television service as ZON TV, dropping the 16-year-old TV Cabo brand.
In 2013, the merger with Optimus (which also includes Optimus Clix, Optimus Kanguru, Optimus Tag, Smart and WTF) was approved and the company was renamed to ZON Optimus. In May 2014, the two brands ZON and Optimus were merged into one single brand, called NOS (meaning "us").
See also[edit]

Internet in Portugal

References[edit]

^ http://www.nos.pt/institucional/Documents/Noticias%20e%20Comunicados/NOS%20FY15%20ENGLISH.pdf
^ http://www.nos.pt/institucional/Documents/Noticias%20e%20Comunicados/NOS%20FY15%20ENGLISH.pdf
^ http://www.nos.pt/institucional/Documents/Noticias%20e%20Comunicados/NOS%20FY15%20ENGLISH.pdf
^ http://www.peprobe.com/pt-pt/document/zon-optimus-full-year-2013-results
^ "Annual Report 2012" (PDF). ZON Multimedia. Retrieved 25 January 2013. 

External links[edit]

Official website
ZON website
Optimus website
List of channels on NOS







v
t
e


Television in Portugal



RTP



RTP1
RTP2
RTP3
RTP Memória
RTP HD
RTP Madeira
RTP Açores
RTP África
RTP Internacional





SIC



SIC
SIC Notícias
SIC Mulher
SIC Radical
SIC K
SIC Caras
SIC Internacional





TVI



TVI
TVI Ficção
TVI 24
TVI Reality
TVI África
TVI Internacional





Dreamia



Canal Hollywood
Canal Panda
Biggs





FOX Portugal



FOX
FOX Life
FOX Crime
FOX Comedy
FOX Movies
National Geographic
Nat Geo Wild
24Kitchen
BabyTV





Disney



Disney Channel
Disney Junior





Globo Portugal



Globo
Globo Premium
PFC





Record Europa



Record
Record News





SportTV



SportTV 1
SportTV 2
SportTV 3
SportTV 4
SportTV 5
SportTV +





Viacom



MTV
Nickelodeon





NOS



TVCine
TVSéries





NEXTV



MVM
RTV





Sony



AXN
AXN White
AXN Black





Discovery



Discovery Channel
Discovery Showcase HD
TLC
Eurosport 1
Eurosport 2
Eurosport News





AMC, History



Odisseia
Canal História
A&E
AMC
Sundance Channel





NBCUniversal



Syfy
E!





Others



A Bola TV
ARtv
Afro Music
Benfica TV
BabyFirst
Caza y Pesca
Canal 180
Canção Nova
Cartoon Network
Cinemundo
CMTV
Eurochannel
Euronews
HOT
JimJam
Kuriakos TV
Localvisão TV
Food
Fuel TV
Fine Living
Playboy TV
Porto Canal
Woohoo
Sporting TV
STV Notícias
TPA
Travel
TV Brasil
Venus





Services and platforms



TDT DTT
NOS HFC, FTTH, SAT
MEO DSL, FTTH, SAT
Vodafone FTTH, DSL
Nowo HFC






bold -free-to-air DTT Italics - free-to-air regional DTT.










v
t
e


Cable, satellite, and other speciality television providers in Europe



Cable



Alma TV
Anvia
ASTA-NET
AS Starman
ASK CATV (Bosnia and Herzegovina)
Nowo (Portugal)
Caiway (Netherlands)
Canal Digital (Norway)
Casema
Com Hem (Sweden)
dna Welho (Finland)
EVision (Ireland)
ELTA-KABEL (Bosnia and Herzegovina)
ER-Telecom
Get
GO (Malta)
INEA (Poland)
IPKO
Kabel Deutschland (Germany)
Kabel Noord
KATV1 (Azerbaijan)
Kazakhtelecom (Kazakhstan)
Kujtesa
Lattelecom
Madritel
Magnet Networks
Magyar Telekom
MC Cable
Melita Cable
MEO (Portugal)
MISS.NET (Bosnia and Herzegovina)
Movistar+ (Spain)
Mtel (Bulgaria)
MTIS (Belarus)
M&H Company
Naxoo (Switzerland)
North-West Telecom
NOS (Portugal)
Numericable-SFR (France)
SFR (Belgium)
ONO (Spain)
Orange TV (France)
Petrus (Poland)
PostTV Luxembourg
Primacom (Germany)
Promax (Poland)
Radijus Vektor
RCS & RDS (Romania)
Rostelecom (Russia)
R (Spain)
Sappa TV
Sat Film (Poland)
SATRO (Slovakia)
SEEMORE
Serbia Broadband (Serbia)
Southern Telecom
Splius (Lithuania)
Stofa (Demnark)
STV AS
Swisscom
Tango TV (Luxembourg)
Telecable (Spain)
Telekabel (Macedonia)
Tele Columbus (Germany)
Tele2
Telemach (Bosnia and Herzegovina, Montenegro and Slovenia)
Telenet (Belgium)
Teledünya (Turkey)
Telset (Estonia)
Terrakom
TOYA (Poland)
Turksat Kablo TV (Turkey)
Unitymedia (Germany)
Uralsvyazinform
UPC Austria
UPC Magyarország (Hungary)
UPC Polska (Poland)
UPC Romania
UPC Switzerland
VECTRA
Virgin TV (UK)
Virgin Media Ireland
Vodafone Ireland
Vodafone TV
VolgaTelecom
Volia (Ukraine)
VOO
WightFibre
YouSee (Denmark)
Ziggo (Netherlands)





Satellite



AB Sat (France)
AKTA TV (Romania)
Antik Sat
Austriasat
Bulsatcom
Canal Digital (Denmark, Sweden, Norway and Finland)
CanalDigitaal (Netherlands and Flanders)
Canalsat (France)
Caspio HD
Cosmote TV (Greece)
CS Link
Cyfrowy Polsat (Poland)
Digi TV
Digit-Alb
Digiturk (Turkey)
Dolce (Romania)
D-Smart (Turkey)
Euro1080
Filbox
Focus Sat (Romania)
fransat
Freesat (UK)
Freesat from Sky (UK)
Free Sat (Romania)
GlobeCast World TV
HD+ (Germany)
MagtiCom (Georgia)
Movistar+ (Spain)
Mtel (Bulgaria)
MEO (Portugal)
NC+ (Poland)
NOS (Portugal)
NOVA Cyprus
NOVA Greece
NTV Plus (Russia)
Orbita Telecom
Otau TV (Kazakhstan)
Real Digital
Saorsat
Sky UK
Sky Deutschland (Germany)
Sky Ireland
Sky Italia (Italy)
Skylink
TéléSAT Numérique (Belgium)
Tivù Sat (Italy)
TNTSAT
TotalTV
Tricolor TV (Russia)
Tring Digital TV
TV Vlaanderen Digitaal (Flanders)
UPC Direct
Viasat (Denmark, Sweden, Norway, Finland, Latvia, Estonia and Lithuania)
Viasat Ukraine
Vip SAT TV
Vivacom
Xtra TV (Ukraine)
ZeonBud





IPTV



A1 Telekom Austria
Altibox
Amis
Beeline
Bouygues Telecom
BT TV (UK)
Bulsatcom (Bulgaria)
Canal Digital
Cosmote TV (Greece)
CytaVision (Cyprus)
DartyBox (France)
Fastweb (Italy)
Free (France)
Freewire (UK)
HOME.TV (Bosnia and Herzegovina)
iNES (Romania)
Infostrada TV (Italy)
KPN (Netherlands)
Magnet Networks (Ireland)
Moja TV (Bosnia and Herzegovina)
Moldtelecom
Movistar+ (Spain)
Mtel (Bulgaria)
Mts TV (Serbia)
MEO (Portugal)
Neuf Cegetel
NOS (Portugal)
Open IPTV (Bosnia and Herzegovina)
Optimus Clix (Portugal)
Orange TV (France)
Plusnet
Portugal Telecom
PrimeTel (Cyprus)
Proximus TV (Belgium)
Sappa TV
Scarlet (Belgium)
SFR (France)
ShqipTV
Síminn (Iceland)
Smart Telecom (Ireland)
Super TV (Bosnia and Herzegovina)
Sure TV
T-2 (Slovenia)
TalkTalk TV (UK)
Telekom Entertain (Germany)
Telenor (Norway)
Telfort (Netherlands)
Telia Digital-tv
TeliaSonera
Teo LT
TIMvision
Tivibu
YouView (UK)
Vivacom (Bulgaria)
Vodafone Greece
Vodafone Portugal
XS4ALL (Netherlands)





Terrestrial



Antena PLUS (Serbia)
Boxer TV Access (Sweden)
Boxer TV A/S (Denmark)
Digea (Greece)
Easy TV (Ireland)
evotv (Croatia)
Freeview (UK)
KPN Digitenne (Netherlands)
Mediaset Premium (Italy)
PlusTV (Finland)
PTDT (Portugal)
RiksTV (Norway)
Saorview (Ireland)
TNT (France)
Vip TV (Macedonia)
Zala TV (Belarus)





Defunct



Alice Home TV
Boom TV (Romania)
CableTel (Bulgaria)
On Telecoms (Greece)
Romtelecom
Numericable
UPC Nederland
TDC (Denmark)












v
t
e


 PSI-20 companies of Portugal






Altri
Banco Comercial Português
Banco Português de Investimento
Banif
CTT Correios de Portugal
Energias de Portugal
EDP Renováveis
Galp Energia
Impresa
Jerónimo Martins
Mota-Engil
NOS
Portucel Soporcel
PHarol
Redes Energéticas Nacionais
Semapa
Sonae
Teixeira Duarte










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=NOS_(Portuguese_media_company)&oldid=775221847"					
Categories: Cable television companiesTelevision in PortugalVoIP servicesVoIP companiesMobile virtual network operatorsInternet service providers of PortugalPortuguese-language television networksCompanies based in LisbonCompanies established in 19941994 establishments in PortugalPortuguese brandsHidden categories: Pages using deprecated image syntaxPages using infobox company with unsupported parameters 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


DeutschFrançaisGalegoPortuguês 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 13 April 2017, at 13:48.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 








	Market Report: Nos SGPS SA - Strategy, SWOT and Corporate Finance Report

















































ABOUT US

• PUBLISHERS
• CONTACT US
• CART




Login | Register















All Industries
Business & Finance
-- Business
-- Financial Services
-- Insurance
-- Marketing
Consumer & Food
-- Beverages
-- Consumer Goods
-- Food
-- Retailing
Healthcare
-- Biotechnology
-- Healthcare
-- Medical Devices
-- Pharmaceuticals
Heavy Industry
-- Construction
-- Energy
-- Manufacturing
-- Materials
-- Transportation
Internet & Media
-- E-Business
-- Internet
-- Media
-- Publishing
Public Sector
-- Defense
-- Education
-- Government
Telecom & Computing
-- Computer Technology
-- Fixed Networks
-- Software
-- Wireless
Company/Country Reports
-- Company Reports
-- Country Reports
-- Regional Reports


 
            













                        Processing...




Nos SGPS SA - Strategy, SWOT and Corporate Finance Report

     
                        Jan 31, 2017 - MarketLine 
                    
                - 25 pages 
                - USD $175 
         





Click here to open the POPUP


                        You've added the following report to your cart:CLOSE








Cart Summary



                                    Total Items: 
                                

                                    SubTotal: 
                                


    









Report Summary


Table of Contents


Companies


Request Details


Related







Nos SGPS SA - Strategy, SWOT and Corporate Finance Report, is a source of comprehensive company data and information. The report covers the company's structure, operation, SWOT analysis, product and service offerings and corporate actions, providing a 360deg view of the company.Key FindingsDetailed information on Nos SGPS SA required for business and competitor intelligence needsA study of the major internal and external factors affecting Nos SGPS SA in the form of a SWOT analysisAn in-depth view of the business model of Nos SGPS SA including a breakdown and examination of key business segmentsIntelligence on Nos SGPS SA's mergers and acquisitions (MandA), strategic partnerships and alliances, capital raising, private equity transactions, and financial and legal advisorsNews about Nos SGPS SA, such as business expansion, restructuring, and contract winsLarge number of easy-to-grasp charts and graphs that present important data and key trendsReasons to Get this ReportGain understanding of Nos SGPS SA and the factors that influence its strategies.Track strategic initiatives of the company and latest corporate news and actions.Assess Nos SGPS SA as a prospective partner, vendor or supplier.Support sales activities by understanding your customers' businesses better.Stay up to date on Nos SGPS SA's business structure, strategy and prospects.Report HighlightsNos SGPS SA (NOS), formerly ZON Optimus, SGPS, S.A. (ZON Optimus), is a holding company, provides broadcasting, cable and satellite services. The company offers fixed and mobile solutions for Pay TV, internet, and audiovisual segments. It is involved in distribution of cable and satellite television, production, editing and distribution of movies and television series, movie exhibition, production and sale of videos, managing sport and children's channels, and providing advertising space on pay television channels and cinemas. The company is also involved in deployment, installation and management of telecommunication towers and other electronic communication and real estate business. NOS Optimus is headquartered in Lisbon, Portugal.
Company Snapshot- Nos SGPS SA: Company Overview- Nos SGPS SA: Overview and Key Facts--- Nos SGPS SA: Overview--- Nos SGPS SA: Key Facts- Nos SGPS SA: Key Employees- Nos SGPS SA: Key Employee Biographies- Nos SGPS SA: Major Products and Services- Nos SGPS SA: Company History- Nos SGPS SA: Management Statement- Nos SGPS SA: Locations and Subsidiaries- Nos SGPS SA: Key CompetitorsNos SGPS SA: Company Analysis- Nos SGPS SA: Business Description- Nos SGPS SA: SWOT Analysis--- Nos SGPS SA: SWOT Overview--- Nos SGPS SA: Strengths--- Nos SGPS SA: Weaknesses--- Nos SGPS SA: Opportunities--- Nos SGPS SA: ThreatsAppendix- Contact Us- Methodology- Definitions- About DatamonitorList of TablesTable 1: Nos SGPS SA: Key FactsTable 2: Nos SGPS SA: Key EmployeesTable 4: Nos SGPS SA: Key Competitors
Companies Mentioned in this ReportNos SGPS SA
This report does not have a press release associated with it









Order Today!

FORMAT: PDF 
$175  USD
LICENSE: Single User 
DELIVERY: By Email - 1 Business Day


























The Fast Market Research Advantage

Only the Best
            All of our research is sourced from the most trusted and established global analysts and consultancies
Client Focused
            From start-ups to multinationals, we focus on providing the right research to our diverse client base
Shop Securely
            Our US-based customer service team and eCommerce systems adhere to the highest data security standards
Industry-leading Customer Support
            Individualized assistance from our expert staff is never more than an email or phone call away




BEST PRICE GUARANTEE
We are committed to providing the best research at the lowest cost.  We will match any published price for the same report, guaranteed!



EASY ORDERING
Once you’ve found the right report, click ‘order now’ and complete the checkout process
using any major credit card, check or wire/bank transfer.Need multi-user or enterprise license pricing?  Contact us for a custom quote!
                  




About the Publisher
MarketLine is a global publisher of company, industry and country information. Their clients operate across a wide variety of industries and job functions and range from multinational corporations right down to small businesses in both developed and developing economies. MarketLine users enjoy access to content that is trustworthy, up to date and reasonably priced and routinely turn to them as their first-stop resource for instantly accessible, reliable business information. MarketLine is wholly owned subsidiary of Datamonitor.

Publisher Details







Privacy Policy | Terms of Use | FLASHALERTS


Copyright &copy 2017 Fast Market Research, Inc.



















Nos SGPS SA (via Public) / 08-02-17 - NOS TV app voted ‘Product of the Year’ 2017



























                        Hello .
                    


 Taiwan 







News


International News


Education


Environment


Healthcare


Technology


Internet




Science


Social and Non-Profit


Local News




Politicsand Policy


Government


Politics


Local Government


International Policy




Businessand Economy


Economy


Finance


Stock Markets




Jobs and Labor


Company News


Industry News


Aerospace


Agriculture


Chemicals


Commodities


Construction


Consumer Electronics


Defense


Energy


Nuclear Energy


Oil and Gas


Renewable Energy




Financial Services


Banking


Insurance




Fishing and Aquaculture


Manufacturing


Information Technology


Metals and Mining


Pharmaceuticals and Biotechnology


Real Estate


Professional and Business Services


Legal




Telecommunications


Tobacco


Retail


Transportation


Air Transportation


Maritime Transportation


Rail Transportation


Road Transportation




Utilities


Forestry and Wood Industry






Artsand Culture


Art


Books and Literature


Entertainment


Cinema


Media


Radio and Television




Music






Lifestyleand Leisure


Automotive


Home and Garden


Fashion and Luxury


Clothing and Textile




Food


Travel and Hospitality


Boating and Yachting




Sports


Baseball


Basketball


Boxing


Cricket


Cycling


Football (American)


Football (Australian)


Football (Soccer)


Golf


Hockey


Racing


Rugby


Sailing


Skiing and Winter Sports


Tennis


Volleyball











noodls browser compatibility check

The security settings of your browser are blocking the execution of scripts.
To use noodls, javascript support must be enabled. Please change your browser's security settings to enable javascript.
If you have changed your browser's security settings, you can click here.






related announcements
International News


FEI - Fédération Equestre[...]
Longines FEI World Cup™ Jumping NAL receives further boost in Canada[...]


European External Action Service
Déclaration du porte-parole sur les attentats perpétrés en Somalie


African Union
PRE-ELECTION STATEMENT The African Union Election Observation Mission[...]


More
Technology


AUSL Parma
03/08/2017 - Fascicolo sanitario elettronico Langhirano


Metaswitch Networks Ltd.
4 reasons why network operators should adopt NFV


PD - Partito Democratico (Gruppo[...]
Esposito: Salvataggio in mare non si discute, polemiche strumentali


More











search






















Nos SGPS SA



08/02/2017 | Press release | Distributed by Public on 09/02/2017 18:10
08-02-17 - NOS TV app voted ‘Product of the Year’ 2017







      PRESS RELEASE
    

      8/ 2/ 2017
    

      NOS TV APP VOTED 'PRODUCT OF THE YEAR' 2017
    

      The Portuguese have chosen the Online TV application of NOS, which enables users to access TV and multidevice contents in an easy and intuitive way.
    

      Once again, Portuguese consumers have recognised NOS' innovation, awarding the highest distinction to the operator in the TV App category. At the 13th Product of the Year competition, the Portuguese showed their preference for the TV Application, NOS TV, which has been designed and developed entirely from scratch by NOS Innovation, positioning the NOS research and development team again as one of those winning the most prizes, and being recognised internationally for its unique product launches at a worldwide level.
    

      This prize recognises the ever increasing relevance of the use of other devices for the consumption of TV and entertainment in general, away from and at home. This market trend highlights the increased importance of solutions such as NOS TV, which focuses on the multi-screen experience on box, PC, tablet or smartphone.
    

      NOS TV has more than 120 channels, 111 of which feature Restart TV and Automatic Recording functionalities, and can be synchronised with the user's television profile, optimising the experience of recommendations and of exploring contents using automatic and intelligent interaction between the television and the tablet.
    

      In addition, users can decide at any time, where they want to watch or continue to watch, using the new functionalities "Send to TV" and "Continue to watch", available on NOS TV. These options thus allow content which they are watching on their PC, smart phone or tablet to be "sent" to the TV, or to continue to watch content, that they are watching on television, on one of these three devices without losing the context.
    

      To be noted is the fact that NOS TV was presented at the first Web Summit event in augmented reality. By using the HoloLens App, NOS TV makes use of customers' line of vision to put service
    

      Direção de Comunicação Corporativa & Sustentabilidade
    

      Edifício Campo Grande,
    

      Rua Ator António Silva, 9, Piso 6, Lisboa
    

T 217 824 700 | [email protected] | www.nos.pt


      BAN
    

João Santos Pereira [email protected]


      T 937 612 332
    

      windows wherever they want, and so create and benefit from an interactive experience with the television that is even more personalised and immersive.
    

      The NOS TV App reflects NOS' focus on consolidating its position as a convergent operator, attentive to the needs of customers constantly on the move, providing the same quality experience when accessing any of their contents, whatever the device used.
    

      About 'Product of the Year'
    

      The "Product of the Year - Marketing and Innovation Grand Prix" provides certification of innovatory new products through a survey that is conducted every year. The products are chosen exclusively by consumers by direct voting via an independent multi-brand market survey. Applications are scrutinised by a committee made up of industry, marketing and distribution professionals, and the questionnaire is completed by more than 2,200 individuals of both sexes resident on the Portuguese mainland who are between 18 and 64 years old. Consumers vote for the Product of the Year based on the novelty of the product, its level of use and level of satisfaction. The Product of the Year event is organised in more than 40 countries, in particular in France, Switzerland, Germany, Austria, Chile, Argentina, Peru and China. In Portugal, it is organised by Peres & Partners.
    

      About NOS
    

      NOS is the biggest communications and entertainment group in Portugal. It offers latest generation fixed and mobile phone, television, Internet, voice and data solutions for all market segments. It is leader in Pay TV, new generation broadband services and in cinema exhibition and distribution in Portugal.
    

      In the business segment, it has positioned itself as a sustainable alternative in the Corporate and Mass Business segments, offering a broad portfolio of products and services with tailor made solutions for every sector and businesses of different sizes, complementing its offer with ICT and Cloud services.
    

      NOS is part of the main Portuguese stock exchange index (PSI-20) with a capitalisation of more than 3.8 thousand million Euros, and has more than 4 million mobile phone, 1.5 million television, 1.5 million fixed telephone and 1.1 million fixed broad band Internet customers.
    

      NOS Audiovisuais
    

      Edifício Campo Grande,
    

      Rua Ator António Silva, 9, Piso 2, Lisboa
    

T 931 018 685 | [email protected] | www.nos.pt


      BAN
    

João Santos Pereira [email protected]


      T 937 612 332
    












Sharing and Personal Tools

Please select the service you want to use:

Newsvine
Digg
Delicious
StumbleUpon
Technorati
Buzz
Favorites
Google Reader





Public link

Please use the above public link if you want to share this noodl on another website.


Close





Smartlinks
| Nos SGPS SA
| International News
| Technology
| Internet
| Internet and Online Services
| Manufacturing
| Telecommunications Services
| Media and Publishing
| Broadcasting
| Media and Entertainment Companies
| Euronext
| Börse Berlin
| Börse Düsseldorf
| OTC Markets




 Back


 View original format











Copyright ©2006-2017 Public Technologies Inc.  | 
Privacy Policy | Terms of Use | Contact







NOS S.G.P.S. S.A (LSE:0J1Z) - Fundamentals Analysis



































































Loading...


 
















User Profile
Paid plan pricing

  Nothing to display.





Profile
Support
Learning
About
Logout



Dashboard



Sign up


Login



 









 





















NOS S.G.P.S. S.A
LSE:0J1Z












Snowflake Description
Proven track record and fair value. 
The Snowflake is generated from 30 checks in 5 different areas, read more below.









0J1Z
LSE
€3B
Market Cap





 Add to portfolio

Cable and Satellite
Company description
NOS, S.G.P.S., S.A. offers integrated telecommunications services worldwide. More info.

Find similar companies 


 Add to Portfolio
 Compare
 Print
 Invest

Hi, it looks like you haven't created a portfolio yet!You can import an existing one from Google Finance or your Broker.

Create Portfolio
×










SHARE PRICE


3 Month History







0J1Z















Industry





5yr Volatility vs Market





Competitors












Sky

LSE:SKY
 Add
Compare




















Value
 Is NOS S.G.P.S. S.A undervalued based on future cash flows and its price relative to the stock market?

Value is all about what a company is worth versus what price it is available for. If you went into a grocery store and all the bananas were on sale at half price, they could be considered undervalued.



INTRINSIC VALUE BASED ON FUTURE CASH FLOWS 


Here we compare the current
share price of NOS S.G.P.S. S.A to its discounted cash flow value.
The discounted cash flow value is simply looking at what the company is worth today, based on estimates of how much money it is expected to make in the future.



 How is this discounted cash flow calculated?

Current Discount
Amount off the current price NOS S.G.P.S. S.A is available for.


11%
Share price is €5.467 vs Future cash flow value of €6.16



Current Discount Checks 
For NOS S.G.P.S. S.A to be considered undervalued it must be available for at least 20% below the current price. Less than 40% is even better.
NOS S.G.P.S. S.A's share price is below the future cash flow value, but not at a significant discount (< 20%).

NOS S.G.P.S. S.A's share price is below the future cash flow value, but not at a substantial discount (< 40%).





PRICE RELATIVE TO MARKET 


We can also value a company based on what the stock market is willing to pay for it. This is similar to the price of fruit (e.g. Mangoes or Avacados) increasing when they are out of season, or how much your home is worth.
The amount the stock market is willing to pay for NOS S.G.P.S. S.A's earnings, growth and assets is considered below, and whether this is a fair price.




Price based on past earnings

Are NOS S.G.P.S. S.A's earnings available for a low price, and how does this compare to other companies in the same industry?


Good value based on earnings compared to the Media industry average.

Good value based on earnings compared to the overall market.




Price based on expected Growth
Does NOS S.G.P.S. S.A's expected growth come at a high price?


Poor value based on expected growth next year.




Price based on value of assets
What value do investors place on NOS S.G.P.S. S.A's assets?


Good value based on assets compared to the Media industry average.







X
Value checks
We assess NOS S.G.P.S. S.A's value by looking at:

Is the discounted cash flow value less than 20%, or 40% of the share price? (2 checks) (Click here or on bar chart for details of DCF calculation.)
Is the PE ratio less than the market average, and/ or less than the Media industry average (and greater than 0)? (2 checks)
Is the PEG ratio within a reasonable range (0 to 1)? (1 check)
Is the PB ratio less than the Media industry average (and greater than 0)? (1 check)
NOS S.G.P.S. S.A has a total score of 3/6, see the detailed checks below.
Note: We use GAAP Earnings per Share in all our calculations including PE and PEG Ratio.
Note 2: PEG ratio is based on analysts EPS growth expectations in 1 year (16%).
Full details on the Value part of the Simply Wall St company analysis model.





X

Discounted cash flow (Free cash flow to Equity)
The calculations below outline how an intrinsic value for NOS S.G.P.S. S.A is arrived at by discounting future cash flows to their present value. We use analyst's estimates of cash flows going forward 5 years.
See our documentation to learn about this calculation.
5 year cash flow forecast



2017
2018
2019
2020
2021


Levered FCF (EUR, Millions)
€130.30
€162.62
€186.63
€225.60
€296.90


Source
Analyst x4
Analyst x6
Analyst x6
Analyst x3
Analyst x1


Present ValueDiscounted (@ 9.2%)
€119.35
€136.42
€143.41
€158.77
€191.39


Present value of next 5 years cash flows:€749
Terminal Value
Terminal Value = FCF2021 × (1 + g) ÷ (Discount Rate – g)
Terminal Value = €297 × (1 + 1.2%) ÷ (9.18% – 1.2%)
Terminal value based on the Perpetuity Method where growth (g) = 1.2%:
€3,750
Present value of terminal value:€2,418
Equity Value
Equity Value (Total value) = Present value of next 5 years cash flows + terminal value
Value = Total value / Shares Outstanding (€3,167 / 514)
Value per share: €6.16
Current discount (share price of €5.467): 11%

Estimate of Discount Rate
The discount rate, or required rate of return, is estimated by calculating the Cost of Equity.
Discount rate = Cost of Equity = Risk Free Rate + (Levered Beta * Equity Risk Premium)
Discount rate = 9.18% = 1.17% + (0.907 * 8.83%)

Estimate of Bottom Up Beta
The Levered Beta is the Unlevered Beta adjusted for financial leverage. It is limited to 0.8 to 2.0 (practical range for a stable firm).
Levered Beta = Unlevered beta (1 + (1- tax rate) (Debt/Equity))
0.907 = 0.69 (1 + (1- 21%) (39.74%))
Levered Beta used in calculation = 0.907

Assumptions

The risk free rate of 1.17% is from the 10 year government bond rate in GB.
The bottom-up beta is estimated by analysing other companies in the same industry.
The Equity Risk Premium is calculated by subtracting the risk free rate from the market return premium (10%) (source: Buffet).
The dividend discount model is automatically used for companies in the following industries: Banks, Insurance, Real Estate Investment Trusts (REITs), Diversified Financial Services and Capital Markets.














Future Performance
 How is NOS S.G.P.S. S.A expected to perform in the next 1 to 3 years based on estimates from 13 analysts?


The future performance of a company is measured in the same way as past performance, by looking at estimated growth and how much profit it is expected to make.Future estimates come from professional analysts. Just like forecasting the weather, they don’t always get it right!



53%
Expected earnings growth over 3 years.



Future Earnings growth analysis 
Is NOS S.G.P.S. S.A expected to grow at an attractive rate? We look at the 1 year and 3 year growth below.
Are NOS S.G.P.S. S.A's annual earnings growth expected to exceed 1.8% over the next 3 years?

After 1 year
After 3 years




1 & 3 year estimated growth in earnings




Past and Future Earnings per Share
The accuracy of the analysts who estimate the future performance data can be gauged below. We look back 3 years and see if they were any good at predicting what actually occured. We also show the highest and lowest estimates looking forward to see if there is a wide range.






Analysts growth expectations



2 year growth check 

x1.5?


Which of the these is expected to increase by over 50% in 2 year's time?

Revenue
Cash flow
Profit






Performance in 3 years 

In the same way as past performance we look at the future estimated return (profit) compared to the available funds. We do this looking forward 3 years.




NOS S.G.P.S. S.A is not expected to perform strongly, Return on Equity (ROE) in 3 years is estimated to be below 20%.


Improvement & Relative to industry

Expected to be above the Media industry average.
An improvement in NOS S.G.P.S. S.A's performance (ROE) is expected over the next 3 years.






X
Future performance checks
We assess NOS S.G.P.S. S.A's future performance by looking at:

Is the growth in earnings expected to beat the low risk savings rate, plus a premium to keep pace with inflation, in 1 year and 3 years? (2 checks)
Does the average analyst expect Revenue to increase by 50% or more in 2 years? (1 check)
Does the average analyst expect Operating Cash Flow to increase by 50% or more in 2 years? (1 check)
Does the average analyst expect Net Income (Profit) to increase by 50% or more in 2 years? (1 check)
Is the Return on Equity in 3 years expected to be over 20%? (1 check)

Some of the above checks will fail if the company is expected to be loss making in the relevant year.
NOS S.G.P.S. S.A has a total score of 2/6, see the detailed checks below.
Note: If no +3 year data is available, +2.5 year data may be used.
Note 2: We use GAAP per Share in all our calculations.
Full details on the Future part of the Simply Wall St company analysis model.












Past Performance
 How has NOS S.G.P.S. S.A performed over the past 5 years?

The past performance of a company can be measured by how much growth it has experienced and how much profit it makes relative to the funds and assets it has available.


Past earnings growth
Below we compare NOS S.G.P.S. S.A's growth in the last year to its industry (Media).



Past Earnings growth analysis 
We also check if the company has grown in the past 5 years, and whether it has maintained that growth in the year.
NOS S.G.P.S. S.A's earnings growth has exceeded the industry average over the past year.

NOS S.G.P.S. S.A's 1 year earnings growth exceeds its 5 year annual average (29.1% vs 9.5%).

NOS S.G.P.S. S.A has improved earnings in the past 5 years.




Profit History
NOS S.G.P.S. S.A's revenue and profit over the past 5 years is shown below, any years where they have experienced a loss will show up in red.





Performance last year 

We want to ensure a company is making the most of what it has available. This is done by comparing the return (profit) to a company's available funds, assets and capital.







Poor return on shareholders funds (ROE) last year.
NOS S.G.P.S. S.A performed worse than the Media industry average based on return on assets (ROA) last year.
Performance based on revenue producing assets (ROCE) is broadly the same over 3 years.



Show me more strong past performing companies in the Media industry 




X
Past performance checks
We assess NOS S.G.P.S. S.A's performance over the past 5 years by checking for:

Has earnings per share (EPS) increased in past 5 years? (1 check)
Has the EPS growth in the last year exceeded that of the Media industry? (1 check)
Is the current EPS growth higher than the average annual growth over the past 5 years? (1 check)
Is the Return on Equity (ROE) higher than 20%? (1 check)
Is the Return on Assets (ROA) above industry average? (1 check)
Has the Return on Capital Employed (ROCE) increased from 3 years ago? (1 check)

The above checks will fail if the company has reported a loss in the most recent earnings report. Some checks require at least 3 or 5 years worth of data.
NOS S.G.P.S. S.A has a total score of 4/6, see the detailed checks below.
Note: We use GAAP Earnings per Share in all our calculations.
Full details on the Past part of the Simply Wall St company analysis model.












Health
 How is NOS S.G.P.S. S.A's financial health and their level of debt?

A company's financial position is much like your own financial position, it includes everything you own (assets) and owe (liabilities).

The boxes below represent the relative size of what makes up NOS S.G.P.S. S.A's finances.

The net worth of a company is the difference between its assets and liabilities.



Net Worth 





NOS S.G.P.S. S.A short term (1 year) commitments are greater than its holdings of cash and other short term assets.

NOS S.G.P.S. S.A's long term commitments exceed its cash and other short term assets.


Balance sheet

This treemap shows a more detailed breakdown of NOS S.G.P.S. S.A's finances.
If any of them are yellow this indicates they may be out of proportion and red means they relate to one of the checks below.

Assets



Liabilities and shares


The 'shares' portion represents any funds contributed by the owners (shareholders) and any profits.


High level of stock/ inventory/ unsold assets.

Total debt is not covered by total short term assets.





Historical Debt 

Nearly all companies have debt. Debt in itself isn’t bad, however if the debt is too high, or the company can’t afford to pay the interest on its debts this may have impacts in the future.
The graphic below shows equity (available funds) and debt, we ideally want to see the red area (debt) decreasing.
If there is any debt we look at the companies capability to repay it, and whether the level has increased over the past 5 years.


The level of debt (109%) compared to net worth is high (greater 40%).

The level of debt compared to net worth has been reduced over the past 5 years (622% vs 109% today).

Total debt is well covered by annual operating cash flow (greater than 20% of total debt).

Interest on debt is well covered by earnings (10x coverage).





X
Financial health checks
We assess NOS S.G.P.S. S.A's financial health by checking for:

Are short term assets greater than short term liabilities? (1 check)
Are short term assets greater than long term liabilities? (1 check)
Has the debt to equity ratio increased in the past 5 years? (1 check)
Is the debt to equity ratio over 40%? (1 check)
Is the debt covered by short term assets? (1 check)
Are earnings greater than 5x the interest on debt (if comapany pays interest at all)? (1 check)
NOS S.G.P.S. S.A has a total score of 3/6, see the detailed checks below.

Full details on the Health part of the Simply Wall St company analysis model.












Dividends
 What is NOS S.G.P.S. S.A's current dividend yield, its reliability and sustainability?

Dividends are regular cash payments to you from the company, similar to a bank paying you interest on a savings account.


Annual Dividend Income


3.69%
Current annual income from NOS S.G.P.S. S.A dividends. Estimated to be 5.74% next year.


If you bought €2,000 of NOS S.G.P.S. S.A shares you are expected to receive €74 in your first year as a dividend. 


Dividend Amount 

Here we look how much dividend is being paid, if any. Is it above what you can get in a savings account?
 It is up there with the best dividend paying companies?


Paying above low risk savings rate. (2.3%)
Paying below the markets top dividend payers. (3.98%)




Historical dividend yield

It is important to see if the dividend for a company is stable, and not wildly increasing/decreasing each year. This graph shows you the historical rate to count toward your assessment of the stock.We also check to see if the dividend has increased in the past 10 years.



Dividends per share have been volatile in the past 10 (annual drop of over 10%).
Dividends per share have fallen over the past 10 years.




Current Payout to shareholders 

What portion of NOS S.G.P.S. S.A's earnings are paid to the shareholders as a dividend.


Dividends paid are covered by net profit (1.2x coverage).





Future Payout to shareholders 


Dividends after 3 years are not well covered by net profit (0.9x coverage).





X
Income/ dividend checks
We assess NOS S.G.P.S. S.A's dividend by checking for:

Firstly is the company paying a notable dividend (greater than 0.5%) - if not then the rest of the checks are ignored.
Current dividend yield, is there one at all, is it higher than the low risk savings rate, and is it above the top 25% of dividend payers? (2 checks)
Have they paid a dividend for 10 years, and during this period has the dividend been volatile (drop of more than 25%)? (1 check)
If they have paid a dividend for 10 years has it increased in this time? (1 check)
How sustainable is the dividend, can NOS S.G.P.S. S.A afford to pay it from its earnings today and in 3 years (Payout ratio less than 90%)? (2 checks)
NOS S.G.P.S. S.A has a total score of 2/6, see the detailed checks below.

Full details on the Dividends part of the Simply Wall St company analysis model.




Management
 What is the CEO of NOS S.G.P.S. S.A's salary, the management and board of directors tenure and is there insider trading?

Management is one of the most important areas of a company. We look at unreasonable CEO compensation, how long the team and board of directors have been around for and insider trading.



CEO








Miguel Almeida

COMPENSATION€876,153
AGE50




CEO Bio

Mr. Miguel Nuno Santos Almeida serves as the Chief Executive Officer of NOS SGPS SA. Mr. Almeida served as the Chief Marketing and Sales Officer of Sonaecom, S.G.P.S., S.A. and its Deputy Chairman since December 11, 2009. He served as Deputy Chief Executive Officer of Sonaecom, S.G.P.S., S.A. until April 24, 2014. He serves as Group Senior Executive of Sonae SGPS SA. He serves as the Chief Executive Officer of Optimus at Sonaecom, S.G.P.S., S.A. He served as the Chief Operating Officer of Mobile at Sonaecom, S.G.P.S., S.A. He served as an Executive Director of Telecommunications at Sonae SGPS SA. Mr. Almeida served as an Executive Director of Optimus, responsible for the areas of Marketing & Sales and Marketing Director of Modelo Continente. He serves as an Executive Director of NOS SGPS SA. He serves as a Director of Optimus – Telecomunicações, S.A. and Optimus Towering – Gestão de Torres de Telecomunicações, S.A. and Per-Mar, Sociedade de Construções, S.A. and We Do Consulting – Sistemas de Informação, S.A. and Sonae Telecom, SGPS, S.A. He served as Executive Director of Sonaecom, S.G.P.S., S.A. since April 2005 until April 24, 2014. Mr. Almeida holds a Degree in Mechanical Engineering from the Faculty of Engineering of Porto University and M.B.A. in Marketing from the INSEAD, Fontainebleau.


CEO Compensation 

CEO's compensation has been consistent with company performance over the past year.

CEO's compensation appears reasonable.



Management Team Tenure
Average tenure of the NOS S.G.P.S. S.A management team:


2.6 years

The tenure for the NOS S.G.P.S. S.A management team is about average.

Management Team


Miguel Almeida
TITLECEO & Executive Director 
COMPENSATION€876,153
AGE50



José da Costa
TITLEDeputy Executive Officer
COMPENSATION€659,200
AGE49



André dos Santos Almeida
TITLEExecutive Director 
COMPENSATION€358,247
AGE40



Ana Paula Marques
TITLEExecutive Director 
COMPENSATION€497,822


Manuel António Neto Portugal Ramalho Eanes
TITLEExecutive Director 
COMPENSATION€497,822


Jorge  Graça 
TITLEExecutive Director
COMPENSATION€343,089




Board of Directors Tenure
Average tenure of the NOS S.G.P.S. S.A board of directors:


2.8 years

The average tenure for the NOS S.G.P.S. S.A board of directors is less than 3 years, this suggests a new board.

Board of Directors


Jorge de Brito Pereira
TITLEChairman of the Board
COMPENSATION€134,558


Miguel Almeida
TITLECEO & Executive Director 
COMPENSATION€876,153
AGE50



José da Costa
TITLEDeputy Executive Officer
COMPENSATION€659,200
AGE49



André dos Santos Almeida
TITLEExecutive Director 
COMPENSATION€358,247
AGE40



Ana Paula Marques
TITLEExecutive Director 
COMPENSATION€497,822


Manuel António Neto Portugal Ramalho Eanes
TITLEExecutive Director 
COMPENSATION€497,822





Recent Insider Trading 



Who owns this company?





X
Management checks
We assess NOS S.G.P.S. S.A's management by checking for:

Is the CEO's compensation unreasonable compared to market cap and profit (greater than 0.5% of the company's profit + 0.03% of market cap)? (1 check)
Has the CEO's compensation increased more than 20% whilst the EPS is down more then 20%? (1 check)
Is the average tenure of the management team less than 2 years? (1 check)
Is the average tenure of the board of directors team less than 3 years? (1 check)
NOS S.G.P.S. S.A has a total score of 6/6, this is not included on the snowflake, see the detailed checks below.

Note: We use the top 6 management executives and board members in our calculations.
Note 2: Insider trading include any internal stakeholders and  these transactions.
Full details on the Management part of the Simply Wall St company analysis model.




Company News







Company Info
Description








NOS, S.G.P.S., S.A. offers integrated telecommunications services worldwide. It operates through Telco and Audiovisuals segments. The company offers fixed and mobile solutions for television, Internet, voice, and data for residential, personal, business, and wholesale markets, as well as pay TV, next generation broadband, and cinema distribution and exhibition services. It also provides content; manages and acquires rights; and distributes movies and series. The company distributes its products to cinema, home entertainment, and TV platforms. In addition, it engages in content exhibition in movie theatres; operating as a programming aggregator on a linear and non-linear model, providing channels and services to other operators; managing a pay TV advertising business under the NOS Publicidade brand; selling advertising space; and providing advertising solutions, such as product placement, sponsoring, and complementary online presence related with content wholesale. Further, the company designs, constructs, and manages electronic communications networks, and equipment and infrastructures; and installs and manages towers and other sites for the roll-out of telecommunications equipment. Additionally, it manages real estate properties; commercializes other public events; offers consulting services in the area of information systems; owns intellectual property; provides electronic communications services and equipment; promotes scientific research and development activities; imports, distributes, commercializes, and produces audiovisual products; and purchases, sells, and rents property. It also engages in the realization of urbanization and building construction, planning, urban management, studies, construction and property management, and buy and sale of properties. NOS, S.G.P.S., S.A. has a strategic partnership with Huawei. The company was founded in 1999 and is headquartered in Lisbon, Portugal. NOS, SGPS, S.A. is a subsidiary of ZOPT, SGPS, S.A.


Details

Name:NOS, S.G.P.S., S.A.
Ticker:0J1Z
Exchange:LSE
Founded:1999
Market Cap:€2,809 million
Website:http://www.nos.pt

Listings




Map




Rua Ator António Silva, nº 9, Lisbon, 1600-404, Portugal






Number of employees



Street





Current staff


2,522
NOS S.G.P.S. S.A employees.



Industry



Industry:Cable and Satellite
Sector:Media










About
Company
Plans
 
Simply Wall St News
 
Learning Center
Help Center
 
Sitemap
Terms and Conditions
Privacy Policy





Related Companies


MSG Networks (NYSE:MSGN)


WideOpenWest (NYSE:WOW)


Loral Space & Communications (NasdaqGS:LORL)


COGECO (TSX:CGO)


SKY Network Television (NZSE:SKT)


Videocon d2h (NasdaqGS:VDTH)


NeuLion (TSX:NLN)


Seven Stars Cloud Group (NasdaqCM:SSC)


Brave Bison Group (AIM:BBSN)


Tele Columbus (LSE:0R50)






Related Industries


Media







© 2017 Simply Wall Street Pty Ltd, Community Design 2845206, US Design Patent #29/544/281, European Design Registration #2845206, Standard & Poor’s Financial Services LLC. All rights reserved.
This website contains factual information only (RG244B) and not general or personal advice. It does not take into account your investment objectives, financial situation or needs. You should seek independent financial and legal advice to consider if an investment is appropriate for your personal circumstances.
Copyright © 2017, Standard & Poor’s Financial Services LLC. Reproduction of S&P Capital IQ in any form is prohibited except with the prior written permission of S&P. S&P does not guarantee the accuracy, adequacy, completeness or availability of any information and is not responsible for any errors or omissions, regardless of the cause or for the results obtained from the use of such information. S&P DISCLAIMS ANY AND ALL EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, ANY WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY OR FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE OR USE. In no event shall S&P be liable for any direct, indirect, special or consequential damages, costs, expenses, legal fees, or losses (including lost income or lost profit and opportunity costs) in connection with subscriber’s or others’ use of S&P Capital IQ. (2017)




 

Nos SGPS SA ZONNF Profile-Financials-Revenues-Growth-Market-Description                         Please wait while the search results are loading...     Plunkett Research,® Ltd.Our Market Research = Your Smart Decisions  What are you looking for?    Information Marketing & Research PROS   Information for Students & Professors   Subscribers Log In     Home >  Industries  >  Telecommunications  > Nos SGPS SA   Plunkett Research Online: Nos SGPS SA    NOS SGPS SA (ZONNF:GREY) Company Profile, Corporate Revenues, Growth, Market Size, Analysis, Business Forecasts, Market Share, Metrics, SWOTNos SGPS is a triple-play telecommunications company that generates revenue by providing pay-TV services, broadband services, fixed voice, and mobile services to the consumer and business markets. Nos SGPS operates through two main segments, telco and audiovisual. Telco derives revenue from providin..... Nos SGPS SA  Ticker: ZONNFExchange: GREYParent Company: Year Established: Employees: Fiscal Year Ends in  Phone: 351 217824700Fax: Address: Rua Actor António Silvanº9, Campo GrandeLisboa,  1600-404 Portugal MapTypes Of Business Industry Ranks  Total RevenueMarket CapEmployee CountNet IncomeRevenue 3Y GrowthIncome 3Y GrowthReturn on Assets (%)Return on Equity (%)Return on Invested Capital (%) Industry NAICS code:  Cable and Other Subscription Programming Refreshing... Contacts Excel TextDescription  Nos SGPS is a triple-play telecommunications company that generates revenue by providing pay-TV services, broadband services, fixed voice, and mobile services to the consumer and business markets. Nos SGPS operates through two main segments, telco and audiovisual. Telco derives revenue from providin.....See More See More Auditor: Ernst & Young Audit & Associados-SROC, S.A. Legal Advisor:    Financial Details  Compare to Industry Averages  Build Custom Table  Compare Companies $USD, In whole numbers,  except marked * or %201620152014201320122011Financials    Revenue    Cost of Revenue    Gross  Margin %    R&D Expense    Operating  Income    Operating  Margin %    SGA Expense    Net  Income    Earnings Per Share    Dividends    Book Value Per Share    Operating  Cash  Flow    Capital  Expenditure    Free  Cash  FlowProfitability    EBITDA    Return on Assets %    Return on Equity %    Net  Margin %    Assets  Turnover    Financial  LeverageBrands, Divisions and AffiliatesTop Salaries  Other ThoughtsCorporate CultureApparent Female Officers or Directors:     Javascript is disabled.    Request Free Trial Subscriptions Plans & Pricing500 Industries Analyzed for Market Size, Profits and Forecasts25,000 Companies Profiled, Ranked100,000 Industry Statistics150,000 Industry Executives Profiled1,000,000 Words of Trends Analysis Printed Almanacs and Ebooks Custom Research ProjectsA REPRESENTATIVE LIST OF ORGANIZATIONS THAT HAVE USED OUR RESEARCH PRODUCTS:         Take a TourHow to Use Plunkett Research Online-8 MinutesPlunkett Online AccessPlunkett Research BooksContactPhone: 713.932.0000Alternate Phone: 713.961.3282Fax: 713.932.7080E-Mail UsAsk a Product QuestionMedia Interviews, Get a SpeakerCustom ResearchInternational Distributors ListNews & RSSTestimonials  Your tool is very comprehensive and immensely useful. The vertical marketing tool is very helpful, for it assists us in that venue, as well as targeting customers’ competition for new sales…The comprehensive material is absolutely fabulous. I am very impressed, I have to say! Tammy Dalton, National Account Manager, MCI, Tammy Dalton  We are especially trying to push Plunkett since all of our students have to do so much industry research and your interface is so easy to use.  St. John’s College, Library Services  I’m amazed at how much information is available and the various ways to access it. This will be a major resource for our serious job seekers.  Penn State University, Career Services  I really appreciate the depth you were able to get to so quickly (for our project). The team has looked through the material and are very happy with the data you pulled together.  Marketing Manager, Hilton Worldwide  Plunkett Research Online is an excellent resource…the database contains a wealth of useful data on sectors and companies, which is easy to search and well presented.   Help and advice on how to conduct, export and save searches is available at all stages. Penny Crossland, Editor, VIP Magazine  The more I get into the database, the happier I am that we’ll have it–REALLY happy!!!  Between the quality and affordability of your product, its appeal to and value for our users, and the inestimably ethical and loyalty-guaranteeing conduct of your business, I will always have more than sufficient praises to sing for Plunkett Research. Michael Oppenheim, Collections & Reference Services, UCLA  Plunkett Research Online provides a great ‘one stop shop’ for us to quickly come up to speed on major industries. It provides us with an overall analysis of the market, key statistics, and overviews of the major players in the industry in an online service that is fast, easy to navigate, and reliable. Wendy Stotts, Manager, Carlson Companies-Information Center  We are especially trying to push Plunkett’s since all of our students have to do so much industry research and your interface is so easy to use. Gary White, Business Materials Selector, Penn State University     Sign up for Free Research Reports   Subscribe                                 





News on NOS SGPS SA































































                      NEWS HOME
                    

Advertising
Board and Executive Moves
Energy
Health Care
Hedge Funds
M & A
Private Equity
Technology
















                                Organization                            


                                        NOS SGPS SA                                        ▼





                                Topic                            


                                        All Topics                                        ▼








People

                                    Find news about people
                                





Alumni

                                Find news on alumni of any org
                            





Industries

                                Find news on a particular market
                            





Your Contacts

                                Find news on your contacts
                            








Sign up for free daily alerts on this feed:











By pressing Sign Up, you agree to our Terms of Use, Privacy Policy, and the LexisNexis Terms & Conditions


















Follow




                            Change Feed
                        


NOS SGPS SA











Katadyn Group to Acquire Hydro-Photon, Inc., Makers of SteriPEN


                                July 20, 2017                                 • 
                                PR Newswire                            


                                  ... has acquired a number of trusted brands in the last decade, including Optimus Stoves, AlpineAire Foods and Spectra Watermakers. They offer the broadest assortment of ...
                                









ZON-PTC selects RaySearch Laboratories' RayStation as treatment planning system


                                July 13, 2017                                 • 
                                Marketline Newswire                            


                                  ... RaySearch Laboratories AB has announced that the South-East Netherlands Proton Therapy Centre (ZON-PTC) has selected RayStation as its treatment planning system following evaluation of the ...
                                









AXYZ International to Exhibit at AWFS Fair


                                July 13, 2017                                 • 
                                PR Newswire                            


                                  ... global manufacturer of CNC router and knife cutting systems, is exhibiting its Optimus CNC router at the AWFS Fair on July 19-22 at the Las ...
                                









'Transformers' From worst to least-bad


                                June 24, 2017                                 • 
                                The Cincinnati Enquirer (Ohio)                            


                                  ... generous - quite a few have been absolute garbage fires. Autobot mainstays Optimus Prime and Bumblebee have had human allies in stars Shia LaBeouf, Megan ...
                                









What's 'good' got to do with it for franchise? 


                                June 23, 2017                                 • 
                                South Florida Sun-Sentinel                            


                                  ... Hitler, we're told in the middle of a particularly weird exposition dump. Optimus Prime, the last movie's noble sacrificial metal lamb, lands back on his ...
                                









Schick® Hydro® Announces Exclusive Movie Partnership With Transformers: The Last Knight, Directed By Michael Bay, Featuring The Ultimate Alliance Of Technology That Transforms


                                June 15, 2017                                 • 
                                PR Newswire                            


                                  ... Schick Hydro 5 razor converting into Hydrobot, with a fist bump from Optimus Prime for protecting mankind one face at a time. "We are committed ...
                                









Dutch elections: PM's party leading, exit polls show


                                March 15, 2017                                 • 
                                CNN                            


                                  ... indicator of populist sentiment in Europe, exit polls for the national broadcaster NOS indicated Wednesday. Estimates project the People's Party for Freedom and Democracy (VVD) ...
                                









In Dutch Election, European Populism Faces a Big Test


                                March 15, 2017                                 • 
                                The New York Times                            


                                  ... to a survey by the polling firm Ipsos, commissioned by public broadcaster NOS and the largest commercial broadcaster RTL. Anecdotally, volunteers at polling stations, some ...
                                









Espial Reports Fourth Quarter and Full Year 2016 Results


                                February 23, 2017                                 • 
                                Business Wire                            


                                  ... 2017 across Germany within Tele Columbus' network of almost 3.7 million homes NOS, Portugal's primary cable operator, with approximately 1.6 million subscribers, launched their next-generation ...
                                









Tata Elxsi partners with NOS to accelerate RDK deployment


                                February 22, 2017                                 • 
                                Marketline Newswire                            


                                  ... Tata Elxsi has announced that it has partnered with NOS to accelerate RDK deployment by leveraging Tata Elxsi's deep expertise and off-the-shelf ...
                                









NOS Accelerates RDK Deployment With Tata Elxsi's Continuous Integration Environment


                                February 22, 2017                                 • 
                                PR Newswire                            


                                  ... Tata Elxsi has announced that it has partnered with NOS to accelerate RDK deployment by leveraging Tata Elxsi's deep expertise and off-the-shelf ...
                                









'Tinder for orangutans': Dutch zoo to let female choose mate on a tablet


                                January 31, 2017                                 • 
                                The Guardian (London)                            


                                  ... choices, Thomas Bionda, a behavioural biologist at the zoo, told Dutch broadcaster NOS. Since the male orangutan could come from as far away as Singapore, ...
                                









President's Daughter Invests in Portugal 


                                January 15, 2017                                 • 
                                Global Finance Magazine                            


                                  ... she also increased her equity in Portuguese pay television and Internet provider ZON Multimedia. Dos Santos purchased her additional 5% stake in ZON from Spanish ...
                                









EU faces 2017 litmus test as Netherlands, France, Germany go to polls


                                January 4, 2017                                 • 
                                SNL Energy Finance Daily                            


                                  ... the most recent poll of polls published Dec. 21 by Dutch broadcaster NOS showed that the PVV is likely to emerge as the largest single ...
                                









Vincent van Gogh’s Famous Bed May Still Exist In a Small Dutch Town


                                October 31, 2016                                 • 
                                Time Magazine                            


                                  ... who had lost their possessions in the war. Bailey told Dutch broadcaster NOS that he had located a photograph of the truck used to transport ...
                                









Hoist Finance acquires Spanish debt servicing company


                                September 9, 2016                                 • 
                                SNL European Financials Daily                            


                                  ... Hoist Finance AB (publ) acquired Madrid-based debt servicing company Optimus for an undisclosed price. The deal is part of the Swedish firm's ...
                                









Optimus and Hog Butcher debut brutally-funny film about advertising


                                September 1, 2016                                 • 
                                Chicago Business Journal                            


                                  ... of advertising is glamorous? Well think again. Because Chicago-based post production house Optimus and Hog Butcher, a local content creation company, have pulled back the ...
                                









Espial Group Q2 net loss up


                                August 17, 2016                                 • 
                                Marketline Newswire                            


                                  ... quarter, we accomplished significant milestones for our business. The first being that NOS, Portugal's primary cable operator, commercially launched a next-generation video service using Espial's ...
                                









Espial Reports 2016 Second Quarter Results 


                                August 4, 2016                                 • 
                                News Bites Canadian Markets                            


                                  ... million and adjusted EBITDA loss of $2.1 million, $45.7 million in cash. NOS, Portugal's primary cable operator, launched a next-generation IP video service based on ...
                                









Espial Reports 2016 Second Quarter Results


                                August 3, 2016                                 • 
                                Business Wire                            


                                  ... $4.5 million and adjusted EBITDA loss of $2.1 million, $45.7 million in cash.NOS, Portugal's primary cable operator, launched a next-generation IP video service based on ...
                                









Democrats See a Potential Building Block in Those Aggrieved by Trump


                                July 27, 2016                                 • 
                                The New York Times                            


                                  ... he could make up the votes he is expected to lose elsewhere. Optimus, an analytics firm that works for Republican campaigns, examined all the voters ...
                                









Malaysia Airlines strikes deal to settle damages for MH17 victims


                                July 18, 2016                                 • 
                                City A.M.                            


                                  ... shot down over eastern Ukraine two years ago yesterday, Dutch national broadcaster NOS reported. NOS cited Veeru Mewa, a lawyer representing Dutch victims. Under the ...
                                









NOS to deploy Nuance's Dragon TV in next-generation set top boxes


                                June 20, 2016                                 • 
                                Marketline Newswire                            


                                  ... NOS, a media holding company, has announced that it will deploy Nuance Communications's ...
                                









NOS selects ARRIS's ZD4500 set-top for new 4K services in Portugal


                                June 15, 2016                                 • 
                                Marketline Newswire                            


                                  ... NOS, a Portugal-based broadband and TV service provider, has selected the ZD4500 set-top ...
                                









NOS deploys hybrid IP video service from Espial


                                June 13, 2016                                 • 
                                Marketline Newswire                            


                                  ... has deployed a next-generation hybrid IP Video service for Portuguese telecommunications operator, NOS. The service is powered by the Espial G4 STB Client and with ...
                                







Related News Feeds






Board and Executive Moves involving NOS SGPS SA







Alumni of NOS SGPS SA







NOS SGPS SA

























































































































Email







LinkedIn







Facebook







Google+







Tweet







Reddit





Permalink



 






Want to see the full history of news or view news on a particular date? Upgrade to RelSci Professional now!


Start My Free Trial  ➤










 Industry:




 Select a Topic:



 Keyword:



Go  ➤









 Find an Organization:






 Select a Topic:




 Keyword:




Go  ➤









 Find a Person:






 Select a Topic:




 Keyword:




Go  ➤









 Name of a School:







 Or Name of an Organization:









 Select a Topic:




 Keyword:




Go  ➤








Thank you. You are now subscribed.Please wait for the page to refresh...










You are now subscribed to this feed.










You have unsubscribed to this feed.










Thank you. You can now subscribe to more RelSci news feeds.










 To subscribe to more than one feed, please enter a password.




 Please confirm your password



Go  ➤








You've found a premium RelSci Pro feature!



Follow News On Your Contacts

Upgrade to RelSci Pro now to easily sync your contacts and stay in the know on the news about the people important to you.


Start My Free Trial  ➤

Still not convinced? Check out our full listing of features here.



Not Now








You've found a premium RelSci Pro feature!



Search News On Keywords

Curate your news even further with the ability to filter feeds based on specific keywords mentioned in the articles.


Start My Free Trial  ➤

Still not convinced? Check out our full listing of features here.



Not Now













Industries

                        Find news on a particular market
                    





People

                        Find news about people
                    





Organizations

                        Find news about organizations
                    





Alumni

                        Find news on alumni of any org
                    





Your Contacts

                        Find news on your contacts
                    












                Free Daily Alerts
            


                Sign up for free daily alerts on this feed
            




Sign Up ➤

                    By pressing Sign Up, you agree to our Terms of Use, Privacy Policy, and the LexisNexis Terms & Conditions




                Already have an account?  Click here to login.















Are you a RelSci Pro Subscriber?

Login to RelSci Pro 
                        ➤


Not a Pro Subscriber? Log in here to manage your alerts









 Keep me signed in.
        

Login  ➤



        Forgot your Password?
    

























 I have read the LexisNexis terms & conditions




Sign Me Up  ➤













